District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.11

Distribution of sale proceeds.

If one, or some only, of the persons employed under the original contractor shall have served notice on the owner, as aforesaid, before payments made by him to the original contractor, said party or parties shall be entitled to priority of satisfaction out of said proceeds to the amount of such payments; but, subject to this provision, if the proceeds of sale, after paying there out the costs of the suit, shall be insufficient to satisfy the liens of said parties employed under the original contractor the said proceeds shall be distributed ratably among them to the extent of the payments accruing to the original contractor subsequently to the service of notice on the owner by said parties, as aforesaid.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1386, ch. 854, § 1249
1973 Ed., § 38-113.
1981 Ed., § 38-113.